Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202060-165.01
Printed certificate of title; when issued.

(1) A lienholder, at the owner's request, may request the issuance of a printed certificate of title if the owner of the vehicle relocates to another state or country or if requested for any other purpose approved by the department. Upon proof by the owner that a lienholder has not provided the requested certificate of title within fifteen days after the owner's request, the department may issue to the owner a printed certificate of title with all liens duly noted.

(2) If a nonresident applying for a certificate of title pursuant to subsection (4) of section 60-144 indicates on the application that the applicant will immediately surrender the certificate of title to the appropriate official in the applicant's state of residence in order to have a certificate of title issued by that state and the county treasurer finds that there is a lien or encumbrance on the vehicle, the county treasurer shall issue a printed certificate of title with all liens duly noted and deliver the certificate of title to the applicant.

Laws 2009, LB202, § 17;

Laws 2015, LB94, § 1.